Nebraska, session 109, LB404.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB404 LB404
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-2263, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-2263 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
when a court has sentenced an offender to probation, the court shall
specify the term of such probation which shall be not more than five
years upon conviction of a felony or second offense misdemeanor and two
years upon conviction of a first offense misdemeanor.
(b) At sentencing, the court shall provide notice to the offender
that the offender may be eligible to have the conviction set aside as
provided in subsection (2) of section 29-2264 and shall provide
information on how to file such a petition. The State Court Administrator
shall develop standardized advisement language and any forms necessary to
carry out this subdivision.
(c) The court, on application of a probation officer or of the
probationer or on its own motion, may discharge a probationer at any
time.
(2) When a court has sentenced an offender to post-release
supervision, the court shall specify the term of such post-release
supervision as provided in section 28-105. The court, on application of a
probation officer or of the probationer or on its own motion, may
discharge a probationer at any time.
(3) During the term of probation, the court on application of a
probation officer or of the probationer, or its own motion, may modify or
eliminate any of the conditions imposed on the probationer or add further
conditions authorized by section 29-2262. The court on joint application
of the probation officer and the probationer may extend the term of
probation within the limits authorized by subdivision (1)(a) of this
section. This subsection does not preclude a probation officer from
imposing administrative sanctions with the probationer's full knowledge
and consent as authorized by sections 29-2266.01 and 29-2266.02.
(4)(a) Upon completion of the term of probation, or the earlier
-2-

LB404 LB404
2025 2025
discharge of the probationer, the probationer shall be relieved of any
obligations imposed by the order of the court and shall have satisfied
the sentence for his or her crime.
(b) Upon satisfactory fulfillment of the conditions of probation for
the entire period or after discharge from probation prior to the
termination of the period of probation, a probation officer shall notify
the probationer that the probationer may be eligible to have the
conviction set aside as provided in subsection (2) of section 29-2264.
The notice shall include an explanation of the requirements for a
conviction to be set aside, how to file a petition for a conviction to be
set aside, and the effect of and limitations of having a conviction set
aside and an advisement that the probationer consult with an attorney
prior to filing a petition. The State Court Administrator shall develop
standardized advisement language and any forms necessary to carry out
this subdivision.
(5) Whenever a probationer disappears or leaves the jurisdiction of
the court without permission, the time during which he or she keeps his
or her whereabouts hidden or remains away from the jurisdiction of the
court shall be added to the original term of probation.
Sec. 2. Original section 29-2263, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-